Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Time-Share Act of 1981

66-32-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Time-Share Act of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 372, §§ 1, 35; T.C.A., § 64-3201; Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 1.

Cross-References. Membership camping, title 66, ch. 32, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Condominiums, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Comment, An Overview of Time-Sharing and the Tennessee Time-Share Act: Are Purchasers Now Protected?, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 779 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. Prohibiting yard signs in subdivision, OAG 04-041, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS (3/12/04).

66-32-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part and part 2 of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquisition agent” means a person who by means of telephone, mail, advertisement, inducement, solicitation or otherwise attempts directly to encourage any person to attend a sales presentation for a time-share program;

“Advertise” or “advertisement” means any written, printed, verbal or visual offer by an individual or general solicitation;

“Commission” means Tennessee real estate commission, which is an agency created under § 62-13-201;

“Component site” means a specific geographic site at which certain time-share accommodations and facilities are located. If permitted under applicable law, separate phases that are operated as a single development in a particular geographic location and under common management shall be deemed a single component site;

“Developer” means, in the case of any given property, any person or entity which is in the business of creating or which is in the business of selling its own time-share intervals in any time-share program. This definition does not include a person acting solely as a sales agent;

“Development,” “project,” or “property” means all of the real property subject to a project instrument, and containing more than one (1) unit;

“Exchange agent” means a person who exchanges or offers to exchange time-share intervals in an exchange program with other time-share intervals;

“Managing agent” means a person who undertakes the duties, responsibilities, and obligations of the management of a time-sharing program;

“Offering” means any offer to sell, solicitation, inducement or advertisement whether by radio, television, newspaper, magazine or by mail, whereby a person is given an opportunity to acquire a time-share interval within a project located either within or outside the state. Any offering of a time-share interval which is not located in this state shall not be an offering if the developer shall submit appropriate documentation satisfactory to the commission that the time-share program is in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the time-share interval is located and such law is as stringent as this part;

“Person” means one (1) or more natural persons, corporations, partnerships, associations, trusts, other entities, or any combination thereof;

“Project” — See “Development”;

“Project instrument” means one (1) or more recordable documents applicable to the whole project by whatever name denominated, containing restrictions or covenants regulating the use, occupancy or disposition of an entire project, including any amendments to the document, but excluding any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation;

“Property” — See “Development”;

“Public offering statement” means that statement required by § 66-32-112;

“Purchaser” means any person other than a developer or lender who acquires an interest in a time-share interval;

“Reservation system” means the method, arrangement, or procedure by which the owners of vacation club interests are required to compete with other owners of vacation club interests in the same vacation club in order to reserve the use and occupancy of an accommodation of the vacation club for one or more use periods, regardless of whether such reservation system is operated and maintained by the vacation club managing entity, an exchange company, or any other person. In the event that mandatory use of an exchange program is an owner's principal means of obtaining the right to use and occupy a vacation club's accommodations, such arrangement shall be deemed a reservation system for purposes of this subdivision (16) and part 2 of this chapter;

“Sales agent” means a person who sells or offers to sell “time-share intervals” in a “time-share program” to a purchaser. All such sales agents shall be licensed and subject to title 62, chapter 13;

“Time-share estate” means an ownership or leasehold estate in property devoted to a time-share fee, tenants in common, time span ownership, interval ownership, and a time-share lease;

“Time-share instrument” means any document by whatever name denominated, creating or regulating time-share programs, but excluding any law, ordinance or governmental regulation;

“Time-share interval” means a time-share estate or a time-share use;

“Time-share program” means any arrangement for time-share intervals in a time-share project whereby use, occupancy or possession of real property has been made subject to either a time-share estate or time-share use whereby such use, occupancy or possession circulates among purchasers of the time-share intervals according to a fixed or floating time schedule on a periodic basis occurring annually over any period of time in excess of one (1) year;

“Time-share project” means any real property that is subject to a time-share program;

“Time-share resale broker” means any person or entity who undertakes to list, advertise for sale, promote or sell by any means whatsoever more than five (5) time-share intervals per year in one (1) or more time-share projects on behalf of any number of purchasers. A time-share resale broker must be a licensed real estate broker, as defined in § 62-13-102. “Time-share resale broker” does not include:

Any person who has acquired any number of time-share intervals in any number of time-share projects for personal use and occupancy;

Any resale performed by a time-share resale broker affiliated with a duly registered time-share developer, involving time-share intervals under the control of the time-share developer in its project; provided, that the time-share developer is in compliance with § 66-32-137(d); or

A publisher of a newspaper or periodical in general circulation, broadcaster or telecaster in connection with the advertising for resale or other promotion of one (1) or more time-share intervals, so long as the publisher, broadcaster or telecaster is not under common ownership or control with a person required to be licensed by this part or chapter 13 of this title or does not have as its primary purpose the solicitation of resales or other uses of time-share intervals;

“Time-share use” means any contractual right of exclusive occupancy which does not fall within the definition of a “time-share estate” including, without limitation, a vacation license, prepaid hotel reservation, club membership, vacation club interest, limited partnership or vacation bond;

“Unit” means the real property or real property improvement in a project which is divided into time-share intervals;

“Vacation club” means any system or program with respect to which a purchaser obtains, by any means, a recurring right to use and occupy accommodations and facilities, if any, in more than one (1) component site through the mandatory use of a reservation system, whether or not the purchaser's use and occupancy right is coupled with an interest in real property; and

“Vacation club documents” means and includes the one (1) or more documents or instruments, by whatever name denominated, creating or governing a vacation club and the disposition of vacation club interests therein. “Vacation club documents” is intended to be broadly construed to incorporate all terms and conditions of the purchase of a vacation club interest, the incorporation of accommodations and facilities located at component sites into the vacation club, the management and operation of the vacation club's component sites, and the management and operation of the reservation system, including, but not limited to, the reservation system's rules and regulations.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-3202; Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 2; 1985, ch. 98, § 1; 1990, ch. 672, § 2; 1995, ch. 90, §§ 5, 7.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 90-80, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 77 (8/20/90).

66-32-103. Nature of time-share estates — Recordation.

A “time-share estate” is an estate in real property and has the character and incidents of an estate in fee simple at common law or estate for years, if a leasehold, except as expressly modified by this part. This shall supersede any contrary rule at common law.

Each time-share estate constitutes for purposes of title a separate estate or interest in property except for real property tax purposes.

A document transferring or encumbering a time-share estate in real property may not be rejected for recordation because of the nature or duration of that estate or interest.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §§ 64-3203, 64-3204.

66-32-104. Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A zoning, subdivision, or other ordinance or regulation may not discriminate against the creation of time-share intervals or impose any requirement upon a time-share program which it would not impose upon a similar development under a different form of ownership.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 5; T.C.A., § 64-3205.

66-32-105. Time-share units.

A time-share program may be created in any unit, unless expressly prohibited by the project instruments or local governing laws.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 6; T.C.A., § 64-3206.

66-32-106. Instruments for time-share estates.

Project instruments and time-share instruments creating time-share estates must contain the following:

The name of the county in which the property is situated;

The legal description, street address or other description sufficient to identify the property;

Identification of time periods by letter, name, number, or combination thereof;

Identification of time-share estates and, where applicable, the method whereby additional time-share estates may be created;

The formula, fraction or percentage, of the common expenses and any voting rights assigned to each time-share estate and, where applicable, to each unit in a project that is not subject to the time-share program;

Any restrictions on the use, occupancy, alteration or alienation of time-share intervals;

The ownership interest, if any, in personal property and provisions for the care, maintenance and replacement of the commonly owned capital improvements and the commonly owned personal property belonging to the time-share estates. Specifically, an escrow or reserve account shall be established for the repair, replacement and maintenance of capital improvements and personal property; and

Any other matters the developer deems appropriate.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 7; T.C.A., § 64-3207; Acts 1989, ch. 65, § 1.

66-32-107. Time-share estate management.

The time-share instruments for a time-share estate program shall prescribe reasonable arrangements for management and operation of the time-share program and for the maintenance, repair and furnishing of units, which shall ordinarily include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the following:

Creation of an association of time-share estate owners;

Adoption of bylaws for organizing and operating the association;

Payment of costs and expenses of operating the time-share program and owning and maintaining the units;

Employment and termination of employment of the managing agent for the association;

Preparation and dissemination to owners of an annual budget and of operating statements and other financial information concerning the time-share program;

Adoption of standards and rules of conduct for the use and occupancy of units by owners;

Collection of assessments from owners to defray the expenses of management of the time-share program and maintenance of the units, which will include the maintenance of reserve and escrow accounts that will adequately provide for the maintenance and replacement of capital improvements to the commonly owned areas of the time-sharing program and for the timely maintenance and replacement of the personal property commonly owned by the time-share estates;

The board of directors of the property owners association shall decide when maintenance or replacement of capital improvements shall be accomplished and shall set amounts of reserve. The board of directors of the property owners association and managing agent shall disclose to each interval owner, in a written annual report, the status of the required accounts. The report shall include the total funds deposited, the current balance, the interest earned, the purpose and amount of any payouts since the previous report. The report shall include the name and address of the person or persons in responsible charge of the accounts;

Comprehensive general liability insurance for death, bodily injury and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the use of units by owners, their guests and other users;

Methods for providing compensation for use periods or monetary compensation to an owner if a unit cannot be made available for the period to which the owner is entitled by schedule or by confirmed reservation;

Procedures for imposing a monetary penalty or suspension of an owner's rights and privileges in the time-share program for failure of the owner to comply with provisions of the time-share instruments or the rules of the association with respect to the use of the units. Under these procedures an owner must be given notice and the opportunity to refute or explain the charges against such owner in person or in writing to the governing body of the association before a decision to impose discipline is rendered;

Employment of attorneys, accountants and other professional persons as necessary to assist in the management of the time-share program and the units;

The managing agent for the association shall be responsible for the maintenance of an escrow or reserve account, as set by the board of directors, which shall contain the assessments collected for the maintenance and replacement of the capital improvements to the commonly owned areas and for the maintenance and timely replacement of the personal property commonly owned by the time-share estates. Such escrow or reserve accounts shall be maintained in an institution insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or federally insured agencies;

Failure of the managing agent to properly maintain the escrow or reserve accounts, as set by the board of directors, for maintenance and replacement of capital improvements to the common area and the maintenance and timely replacement of the personal property shall constitute a felony and the managing agent shall be subject to the penalties as provided in § 66-32-118; and

The managing agent shall be a licensed real estate firm or bonded agent. The principal broker/agent of the firm shall have control of the accounts required in subdivision (12), and shall enter into a tri-party agreement by and between the commission, the managing agent, and the depository institution, providing for the authority of the commission to access and inspect the account records at all times on behalf of the condominium homeowners association.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 8; T.C.A., § 64-3208; Acts 1989, ch. 65, §§ 2, 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed amendment to T.C.A. §66-32-107, pertaining to management of time-share estates, that did not state that it acted retroactively would not violate either the contract clause of the United States Constitution or Tenn. Const., Art. I, § 20, OAG 04-081, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (4/30/04).

66-32-108. Developer control.

The time-share instruments for a time-share estate program may provide for a “developer control period,” during which the developer or a managing agent selected by the developer may manage the time-share program and the units in the time-share program.

If the time-share instruments for a time-share estate program provide for the establishment of a developer control period, they shall ordinarily include provisions for the following:

Termination of the developer control period by action of the association;

Termination of contracts for goods and services for the time-share program or for units in the time-share program entered into during the developer control period; and

A regular accounting by the developer to the association as to all matters that significantly affect the interests of owners in the time-share program.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 9; T.C.A., § 64-3209.

66-32-109. Instruments for time-share use.

Project instruments and time-share instruments creating time-share uses must contain the following:

Identification by name of the time-share project and street address where the time-share project is situated;

Identification of the time periods, type of units and the units that are in the time-share program and the length of time that the units are committed to the time-share program;

In case of a time-share project, identification of which units are in the time-share program and the method whereby any other units may be added, deleted or substituted; and

Any other matters that the developer deems appropriate.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 10; T.C.A., § 64-3210.

66-32-110. Time-share use management.

The time-share instruments for a time-share use program shall prescribe reasonable arrangements for management and operation of the time-share program and for the maintenance, repair and furnishing of units which shall ordinarily include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the following:

Standards and procedures for upkeep, repair and interior furnishings of units and for providing maid, cleaning, linen and similar services to the units during use periods;

Adoption of standards and rules of conduct governing the use and occupancy of units by owners;

Payment of the costs and expenses of operating the time-share program and owning and maintaining the units;

Selection of a managing agent to act on behalf of the developer;

Preparation and dissemination to owners of an annual budget and of operating statements and other financial information concerning the time-share program;

Procedures for establishing the rights of owners to the use of units by prearrangement or under a first-reserved first-served priority system;

Organization of a management advisory board consisting of time-share use owners including an enumeration of rights and responsibilities of the board;

Procedures for imposing and collecting assessments or use fees from time-share use owners as necessary to defray costs of management of the time-share program and in providing materials and services to the units;

Comprehensive general liability insurance for death, bodily injury and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the use of units by time-share use owners, their guests and other users;

Methods for providing compensating use periods or monetary compensation to an owner if a unit cannot be made available for the period to which the owner is entitled by schedule or a confirmed reservation;

Procedures for imposing a monetary penalty or suspension of an owner's rights and privileges in the time-share program for failure of the owner to comply with the provisions of the time-share instruments or the rules established by the developer with respect to the use of the units. The owners shall be given notice and the opportunity to refute or explain the charges in person or in writing to the management advisory board before a decision to impose discipline is rendered; and

Annual dissemination to all time-share use owners by the developer, or by the managing agent, of a list of the name and mailing addresses of all current time-share use owners in the time-share program.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 11; T.C.A., § 64-3211.

66-32-111. Partition.

No action for partition of a unit may be maintained except as permitted by the time-share instrument.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 12; T.C.A., § 64-3212.

66-32-112. Public offering statement — General provisions.

A public offering statement must be provided to each purchaser of a time-share interval and must contain or fully and accurately disclose:

The name of the developer and the principal address of the developer and the time-share intervals offered in the statement;

A general description of the units including, without limitation, the developer's schedule of commencement and completion of all buildings, units, and amenities or if completed that they have been completed;

As to all units offered by the developer in the same time-share project:

The types and number of units;

Identification of units that are subject to time-share intervals; and

The estimated number of units that may become subject to time-share intervals;

A brief description of the project;

If applicable, any current budget and a projected budget for the time-share intervals for one (1) year after the date of the first transfer to a purchaser. The budget must include, without limitation:

A statement of the amount, or a statement that there is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement;

The projected common expense liability, if any, by category of expenditures for the time-share intervals;

The projected common expense liability for all time-share intervals; and

A statement of any services not reflected in the budget that the developer provides, or expenses that it pays;

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the time-share interval;

A description of any financing offered by the developer;

A statement that within ten (10) days from the date of the signing of the contract made by the purchaser, where the purchaser shall have made an on-site inspection of the time-share project prior to the signing of the contract of purchase, and where the purchaser has not made an on-site inspection of the time-share project prior to the signing of the contract of purchase fifteen (15) days from the date of signing of the contract, the purchaser may cancel any contract for the purchase of a time-share interval from developer;

A statement of any pending suits material to the time-share intervals of which a developer has actual knowledge;

Any restraints on alienation of any number or portion of any time-share intervals;

A description of the insurance coverage, or a statement that there is no insurance coverage, provided for the benefit of time-share interval owners;

Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by time-share interval owners for the use of any facilities related to the property;

The extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of all promised improvements; and

The extent to which a time-share unit may become subject to a tax or other lien arising out of claims against other owners of the same unit.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 13; T.C.A., § 64-3213; Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 3.

Cross-References. Exemptions from public offering statement requirement, §66-32-115.

Material changes to be reported, §66-32-116.

Regulation by commission, §66-32-124.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-32-113. Escrow of deposits.

A developer of a time-share program shall deposit into an escrow account established and held in this state, in an account designated solely for the purpose, by an independent bonded escrow company, or in an institution whose accounts are insured, a governmental agency or instrumentality, one hundred percent (100%) of all funds which are received during the purchaser's cancellation period provided for in this part. The deposit of such funds shall be evidenced by an executed escrow agreement between the escrow agent and the developer, which shall include that:

Its purpose is to protect the purchaser's right to a refund if the purchaser cancels the sales agreement for a time-share interval within the cancellation period;

Funds may be disbursed to the developer by the escrow agent from the escrow account only after expiration of the purchaser's cancellation period and in accordance with the sales agreement;

The escrow agent may release funds to the developer from the escrow account only after receipt of a sworn statement from the developer that no cancellation notice was received before expiration of the cancellation period; and

If a buyer properly terminates the contract pursuant to its terms or pursuant to this part, the funds shall be paid to the buyer together with any interest earned, all as provided in § 66-32-114(a).

Funds so deposited may be invested by the escrow agent in securities of the United States or any agency thereof or in savings or time deposits in institutions insured by an agency of the United States.

If a developer contracts to sell a time-share estate and the construction, furnishings, and landscaping of the property submitted to time-share ownership have not been substantially completed in accordance with the plans and specifications and representations made by the developer in the disclosures required by this part, the developer shall immediately pay into an escrow account established and held in this state, in an account designated solely for the purpose, by an independent bonded escrow company, or in an institution whose accounts are insured, a governmental agency or instrumentality, all payments received by or on behalf of the developer from the buyer on a contract of purchase. The escrow agent may invest the escrow funds in securities of the United States or any agency thereof or in savings or time deposits in institutions insured by an agency of the United States. Funds shall be released from escrow as follows:

If a buyer properly terminates the contract pursuant to its terms or pursuant to this part, the funds shall be paid to the buyer, together with any interest earned;

If the buyer defaults in the performance of the buyer's obligations under the contract of purchase and sale, the funds shall be paid to the developer, together with any interest earned; or

If the funds of a buyer have not been previously disbursed in accordance with this subsection (b), they may be disbursed to the developer by the escrow agent at the closing of the transaction, unless prior to the disbursement the escrow agent received from the buyer written notice of a dispute between the buyer and developer. If the money remains in this account for more than three (3) months and earns interest, the interest shall be paid as provided in this subsection (b).

For the purpose of this section, “substantially completed” means that all amenities, furnishings, appliances and structural components and mechanical systems of buildings are completed and provided as represented in the public offering statement and that the premises are ready for occupancy and the proper governmental authority has caused to be issued a certificate of occupancy.

In lieu of the provisions in subsection (b), a developer may withdraw, after the initial rescission period for cancellation has expired, all payments received by the developer from the buyer toward the sales price, provided:

The developer, prior to withdrawal of any funds, posts a surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit or other financial assurances acceptable to the commission in an amount equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the cost to complete the time-share project. The developer shall be required to submit such cost and financial data as the commission may reasonably require; or

The developer has obtained protection for nondefaulting purchasers in compliance with § 66-32-128, and has obtained a final and binding commitment letter on the construction of the project and a final and binding commitment letter on the financing of the same construction. A bond obtained pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(A) shall be executed by the seller as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety. The bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful compliance of the seller with this part including substantial completion, as defined in subsection (c), of the project and unit and compliance with the contract of purchase.

Payments so withdrawn pursuant to this subsection (d) may be used only to pay for construction costs of the improvements comprising the time-share project.

In lieu of any escrows required by this section, the commission shall have the discretion to accept other financial assurances including, but not limited to, a performance bond or an irrevocable letter of credit in an amount at least equal to or in excess of the cost to complete the time-share project.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 14; T.C.A., § 64-3214; Acts 1982, ch. 753, § 1; 1983, ch. 210, § 4; 1985, ch. 98, §§ 2-4.

Law Reviews.

Comment, An Overview of Time-Sharing and the Tennessee Time-Share Act: Are Purchasers Now Protected?, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 779 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. Requirements that must be satisfied prior to withdrawing funds from escrow, OAG 95-119, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 142 (12/1/95).

66-32-114. Mutual rights of cancellation.

Before transfer of a time-share interval and no later than the date of any sales contract, the developer shall provide the intended transferee with a copy of the public offering statement and any amendments and supplements thereto. The contract is voidable by the purchaser until the purchaser has received the public offering statement. The contract is also voidable by the purchaser for ten (10) days from the date of the signing of the contract by the purchaser if the purchaser shall have made an on-site inspection of the time-share project or any component site prior to the signing of the contract, and if the purchaser did not make an on-site inspection of the time-share project or any component site prior to signing the contract, for fifteen (15) days thereafter. Cancellation is without penalty, and all payments made by the purchaser before cancellation must be refunded within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice of cancellation as provided in subsection (c).

During the applicable rescission period, the developer may cancel the contract of purchase without penalty to either party. The developer shall return all payments due, the purchaser shall return all material received in good condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted. If such materials are not returned, the developer may deduct the cost of the same and return the balance to the purchaser.

If either party elects to cancel a contract pursuant to subsection (a) or (b), that party may do so by hand delivering notice thereof to the other party within the designated period for voiding such contract or by mailing notice thereof by prepaid United States mail, postmarked anytime within the designated period for voiding such contract, to the other party or to such party's agent for service of process. The rescission rights set forth in subsections (a) and (b) may not be waived by either the purchaser or developer.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 15; T.C.A., § 64-3215; Acts 1983, ch. 210, § 5; 2019, ch. 147, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “or any component site” twice in the third sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 147, § 2. April 17, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-32-115. Exemptions from requirement of public offering statement.

The developer shall not be required to prepare and distribute a public offering statement if the developer has registered and there has been issued a public offering statement or similar disclosure document which is provided to purchasers under the following:

Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.);

Federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act (15 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.) in which the time-share program is made a part of the subdivision that is being registered; and

Any federal or Tennessee act which requires a federal or state public offering statement or similar disclosure document to be prepared and provided to purchasers.

A public offering statement need not be prepared or delivered in the case of:

Any transfer of a time-share interval by any time-share interval owner other than the developer and/or his agent;

Any disposition pursuant to court order;

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

A disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition of a time-share interval in a time-share project situated wholly outside the state; provided, that all solicitations, negotiations, and contracts took place wholly outside this state and the contract was executed wholly outside this state;

A gratuitous transfer of a time-share interval; or

Group reservations made for fifteen (15) or more people as a single transaction between a hotel and travel agent or travel groups for hotel accommodations, where deposits are made and held for more than three (3) years in advance.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 16; T.C.A., § 64-3216.

66-32-116. Material change.

The developer shall amend or supplement the public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by §66-32-112. As to any exchange program, the developer shall use the current written materials that are supplied to it for distribution to the time-share interval owners as it is received.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 17; T.C.A., § 64-3217.

66-32-117. Liens.

Unless the purchaser expressly agrees to take subject to or assume a lien prior to transferring a time-share interval other than by deed in lieu of foreclosure, the developer shall record or furnish to the purchaser releases of all liens affecting that time-share interval, or shall provide a surety bond or insurance against the lien.

Unless a time-share interval owner or such owner's predecessor in title agrees otherwise with the lienor, if a lien other than an underlying mortgage or deed of trust becomes effective against more than one (1) time-share interval in a time-share project, any time-share interval owner is entitled to a release of such owner's time-share interval from the lien upon payment of the amount. The payment must be proportionate to the ratio that the time-share interval owner's liability bears to the liabilities of all time-share interval owners whose interests are subject to the lien. Upon receipt of payment, the lienholder shall promptly deliver to the time-share interval owner a release of the lien covering that time-share interval. After payment, the managing entity may not assess or have a lien against that time-share interval for any portion of the expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 18; T.C.A., § 64-3218.

66-32-118. Violations — Attorney's fees — Criminal penalties.

If a developer or any other person subject to this part violates any provision thereof or any provision of the project instruments, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the violation has a claim for appropriate relief. Punitive damages may be awarded for a willful violation of this part. The court may also award reasonable attorney's fees.

Except as provided in subsection (c), any developer or any other person subject to this part who offers or disposes of a time-share interval without having complied with this part or who violates any provision of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Any developer or any other person subject to this part who knowingly, willfully and intentionally offers, disposes of, or jeopardizes the interest of the purchaser of a time-share interval in violation of § 66-32-113, § 66-32-122(a) or § 66-32-128 commits a felony punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than three (3) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Nothing in this part limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct or omission which constitutes a violation under any other provision of this code.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 19; T.C.A., § 64-3219; Acts 1986, ch. 601, § 1; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. The felony penalty provisions in subsection (c) may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-113,40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

66-32-119. Statute of limitations.

A judicial proceeding where the accuracy of the public offering statement or validity of any contract of purchase is in issue and a rescission of the contract or damages is sought must be commenced within four (4) years after the date of the contract of purchase, notwithstanding that the purchaser's terms of payments may extend beyond the period of limitation. However, with respect to the enforcement of provisions in the contract of purchase which require the continued furnishing of services and the reciprocal payments to be made by the purchaser, the period of bringing a judicial proceeding will continue for a period of four (4) years for each breach, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than two (2) years.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 20; T.C.A., § 64-3220.

66-32-120. Financial records.

The person or entity responsible for making and/or collecting common expenses, assessments or maintenance assessments shall keep detailed financial records.

All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available for examination by any time-share interval owner and such owner's authorized agents.

Acts 1981, ch. 372, § 21; T.C.A., § 64-3221.